Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-353
Federal savings and loan association; conversion into state association; effect.

It is hereby expressly declared that said state association shall be merely a continuation of said federal savings and loan association under a new name and new jurisdiction, and such revision of its corporate structure as may be considered necessary for its proper operation under said state jurisdiction.

Laws 1949, c. 7, § 2(3), p. 67.